Utah statutes.
58-55-602.   Payment of construction funds -- Interest.

(1) All unpaid construction funds are payable to the contractor as provided in Section 13-8-5.

(2)  On projects involving multiple buildings, each building shall be considered individually in determining the amount to be paid the contractor.

(3)  Partial occupancy of a building requires payment in direct proportion to the value of the part of the building occupied.

(4)  If any payment is retained or withheld, it shall be retained or withheld and released as provided in Section 13-8-5.



Amended by Chapter 365, 1999 General Session

